en: Flower honeys, Flower honey
de: Blüten Honige, Blütenhonig
es: Mieles de flores
fi: Kukkahunajat, Kukkahunaja
fr: Miels de fleurs, Miel de fleurs, Miels toutes fleurs
he: דבש פרחים
hr: Cvjetni medovi
it: Miele millefiori
lt: Gėlių medus
nl: Bloemenhoningen
pt: Meles de flores, méis de flores, mel de flores
ru: Цветочный мед
sv: Blomster honung
tr: Çiçek balı

fr: Miels de garrigue
nl: Garriguehoningen

en: Forest honeys
de: Waldhonige
fr: Miels de forêt
hr: Šumski medovi
it: Mieli di bosco
nl: Boshoningen

en: Raspberry honeys
fr: Miels de framboisier
hr: Medovi od maline
hu: Málna mézek
it: Miele di lampone
nl: Frambozenbloesemhoningen

fr: Miels de framboisiers sauvages
nl: Wilde frambozenbloesemhoningen

fr: Miels de jujubier
nl: Jujubehoningen

en: Lavender honeys, Lavender honey
de: Lavendelhonige
es: Miel de lavanda
fi: laventelihunaja
fr: Miels de lavande
hr: Medovi od lavande
it: Miele di lavanda
lt: Levandų medus
nl: Lavendelhoningen

en: Alfalfa honeys
fr: Miels de luzerne
zh: 苜蓿蜂蜜

en: Coriander honeys
fr: Miels de coriandre

en: Savory honeys
fr: Miels de sarriette

en: Thyme honeys, Thyme honey
de: Thymianhonig
es: Mieles de tomillo
fi: Timjamihunaja
fr: Miels de thym
hr: Medovi od majčine dušice
it: Miele di timo
lt: Čiobrelių medus
nl: Tijmhoning

en: Lychee honeys, Lychee honey
de: Litschibaumhonig
fr: Miels de litchi
hr: Medovi od ličija
nl: Litchibloesemhoningen

en: Honeys from the Mediterranean Sea
fr: Miels de Méditerrannée
hr: Medovi iz Sredozemnog mora
it: Mieli dal Mar Mediterraneo
nl: Honingen van de Middellandse Zee

fr: Miels de lavande de Méditerrannée
nl: Lavendelhoningen van de Middellandse Zee

fr: Miels de miellat, Miel de miellat, Miels d'insectes
nl: Insectenhoningen

en: Dandelion honeys
fr: Miels de pissenlit
hr: Medovi od maslačka
it: Miele di tarassaco
nl: Paardebloemhoningen

fr: Miels de robinier
nl: Vlinderbloemhoningen

en: Bramble honeys
fr: Miels de ronce
hr: Medovi od kupine
it: Miele di rovo
nl: Braamstruikhoningen

en: Buckwheat honeys
fr: Miels de sarrasin, miels de blé noir
hr: Medovi od heljde
it: Miele di grano saraceno
lt: Medus iš grikių žiedų
nl: Boekweithoningen

en: Linden honeys
de: Lindenhonige
fr: Miels de tilleul
hr: Lipovi medovi
it: Miele di tiglio
nl: Lindebloesemhoningen